Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.200

Aid from federal government—Provisions applicable to authorities.

(1) In addition to the powers conferred upon an authority by other provisions of this chapter, an authority is empowered to borrow money or accept contributions, grants or other financial assistance from the federal government for or in aid of any housing project within its area of operation, to take over or lease or manage any housing project or undertaking constructed or owned by the federal government, and to these ends, to comply with such conditions and enter into such mortgages, trust indentures, leases or agreements as may be necessary, convenient or desirable. It is the purpose and intent of this chapter to authorize every authority to do any and all things necessary or desirable to secure the financial aid or cooperation of the federal government in the undertaking, construction, maintenance or operation of any housing project by such authority.

(2) All housing authorities shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 39.10 RCW except where alternative requirements or procedures of federal law or federal regulation are authorized.

(3) The requirements of chapter 39.12 RCW regarding prevailing wages shall apply to housing authority public works except where specifically preempted by federal law or federal regulation.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 21 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.82.200. Prior: 1939 c 23 s 21; RRS s 6889-21. Formerly RCW 74.24.200.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 39.10.200.